dictsource/hi_rules
.group ब
        ब          bV
        _L23) ब (L21L20_         b        // generated
        _L23) ब (L21L20          b        // generated
        _L22L23) ब (L21L20_      b        // generated
        _L22L23) ब (L21L20       b        // generated
        L23) ब (L21L20_          b        // generated
        L23) ब (L21L20           b        // generated
        _L22) ब (L21्_           b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L21्            b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L21्_        b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L21्         b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L21्_            b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L21्             b@4      // generated
        _L20) ब (L21L22्         b        // generated
        _L22L20) ब (L21L22्      b        // generated
        L20) ब (L21L22्          b        // generated
        _्) ब (L21_              b@4      // generated
        _्) ब (L21L22_           b@4      // generated
        _्) ब (L21               b@4      // generated
        _L22्) ब (L21_           b@4      // generated
        _L22्) ब (L21L22_        b@4      // generated
        _L22्) ब (L21            b@4      // generated
        ्) ब (L21_               b@4      // generated
        ्) ब (L21L22_            b@4      // generated
        ्) ब (L21                b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L23_            b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L23L22_         b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L23             b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L23_         b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L23L22_      b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L23          b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L23_             b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L23L22_          b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L23              b@4      // generated
        _L21) ब (L21L22ड         b        // generated
        _ां) ब (L21_             b@4      // generated
        _ां) ब (L21L22_          b@4      // generated
        _ां) ब (L21              b@4      // generated
        ां) ब (L21_              b@4      // generated
        ां) ब (L21L22_           b@4      // generated
        ां) ब (L21               b@4      // generated
        _L21) ब (L21L22्         b        // generated
        _L22L21) ब (L21L22्      b        // generated
        L21) ब (L21L22्          b        // generated
        _L20) ब (L21L23_         b        // generated
        _L20) ब (L21L23          b        // generated
        _L22L20) ब (L21L23_      b        // generated
        _L22L20) ब (L21L23       b        // generated
        L20) ब (L21L23_          b        // generated
        L20) ब (L21L23           b        // generated
        _L22) ब (पL22_           b        // generated
        _L22) ब (पL22            b        // generated
        _L21) ब (L21L23_         b        // generated
        _L21) ब (L21L23          b        // generated
        _L22L21) ब (L21L23_      b        // generated
        _L22L21) ब (L21L23       b        // generated
        L21) ब (L21L23_          b        // generated
        L21) ब (L21L23           b        // generated
        _L20) ब (L21L22्         b        // generated
        _L22L20) ब (L21L22्      b        // generated
        L20) ब (L21L22्          b        // generated
        बँ         bV~        // + candrabindu
        ब (_       b
        ब (B       b

.group भ
        भ          b#V
        _L23) भ (L21L20_         b#       // generated
        _L23) भ (L21L20          b#       // generated
        _L22L23) भ (L21L20_      b#       // generated
        _L22L23) भ (L21L20       b#       // generated
        L23) भ (L21L20_          b#       // generated
        L23) भ (L21L20           b#       // generated
        _L22) भ (L21्_           b#@4     // generated
        _L22) भ (L21्            b#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) भ (L21्_        b#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) भ (L21्         b#@4     // generated
        L22) भ (L21्_            b#@4     // generated
        L22) भ (L21्             b#@4     // generated
        _L20) भ (L21L22्         b#       // generated
        _L22L20) भ (L21L22्      b#       // generated
        L20) भ (L21L22्          b#       // generated
        _्) भ (L21_              b#@4     // generated
        _्) भ (L21L22_           b#@4     // generated
        _्) भ (L21               b#@4     // generated
        _L22्) भ (L21_           b#@4     // generated
        _L22्) भ (L21L22_        b#@4     // generated
        _L22्) भ (L21            b#@4     // generated
        ्) भ (L21_               b#@4     // generated
        ्) भ (L21L22_            b#@4     // generated
        ्) भ (L21                b#@4     // generated
        _L22) भ (L23_            b#@4     // generated
        _L22) भ (L23L22_         b#@4     // generated
        _L22) भ (L23             b#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) भ (L23_         b#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) भ (L23L22_      b#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) भ (L23          b#@4     // generated
        L22) भ (L23_             b#@4     // generated
        L22) भ (L23L22_          b#@4     // generated
        L22) भ (L23              b#@4     // generated
        _L21) भ (L21L22ड         b#       // generated
        _ां) भ (L21_             b#@4     // generated
        _ां) भ (L21L22_          b#@4     // generated
        _ां) भ (L21              b#@4     // generated
        ां) भ (L21_              b#@4     // generated
        ां) भ (L21L22_           b#@4     // generated
        ां) भ (L21               b#@4     // generated
        _L21) भ (L21L22्         b#       // generated
        _L22L21) भ (L21L22्      b#       // generated
        L21) भ (L21L22्          b#       // generated
        _L20) भ (L21L23_         b#       // generated
        _L20) भ (L21L23          b#       // generated
        _L22L20) भ (L21L23_      b#       // generated
        _L22L20) भ (L21L23       b#       // generated
        L20) भ (L21L23_          b#       // generated
        L20) भ (L21L23           b#       // generated
        _L22) भ (पL22_           b#       // generated
        _L22) भ (पL22            b#       // generated
        _L21) भ (L21L23_         b#       // generated
        _L21) भ (L21L23          b#       // generated
        _L22L21) भ (L21L23_      b#       // generated
        _L22L21) भ (L21L23       b#       // generated
        L21) भ (L21L23_          b#       // generated
        L21) भ (L21L23           b#       // generated
        _L20) भ (L21L22्         b#       // generated
        _L22L20) भ (L21L22्      b#       // generated
        L20) भ (L21L22्          b#       // generated
        भँ         b#V~        // + candrabindu
        भ (_       b#
        भ (B       b#

.group म
        म          mV
        _L23) म (L21L20_         m        // generated
        _L23) म (L21L20          m        // generated
        _L22L23) म (L21L20_      m        // generated
        _L22L23) म (L21L20       m        // generated
        L23) म (L21L20_          m        // generated
        L23) म (L21L20           m        // generated
        _L22) म (L21्_           m@4      // generated
        _L22) म (L21्            m@4      // generated
        _L22L22) म (L21्_        m@4      // generated
        _L22L22) म (L21्         m@4      // generated
        L22) म (L21्_            m@4      // generated
        L22) म (L21्             m@4      // generated
        _L20) म (L21L22्         m        // generated
        _L22L20) म (L21L22्      m        // generated
        L20) म (L21L22्          m        // generated
        _्) म (L21_              m@4      // generated
        _्) म (L21L22_           m@4      // generated
        _्) म (L21               m@4      // generated
        _L22्) म (L21_           m@4      // generated
        _L22्) म (L21L22_        m@4      // generated
        _L22्) म (L21            m@4      // generated
        ्) म (L21_               m@4      // generated
        ्) म (L21L22_            m@4      // generated
        ्) म (L21                m@4      // generated
        _L22) म (L23_            m@4      // generated
        _L22) म (L23L22_         m@4      // generated
        _L22) म (L23             m@4      // generated
        _L22L22) म (L23_         m@4      // generated
        _L22L22) म (L23L22_      m@4      // generated
        _L22L22) म (L23          m@4      // generated
        L22) म (L23_             m@4      // generated
        L22) म (L23L22_          m@4      // generated
        L22) म (L23              m@4      // generated
        _L21) म (L21L22ड         m        // generated
        _ां) म (L21_             m@4      // generated
        _ां) म (L21L22_          m@4      // generated
        _ां) म (L21              m@4      // generated
        ां) म (L21_              m@4      // generated
        ां) म (L21L22_           m@4      // generated
        ां) म (L21               m@4      // generated
        _L21) म (L21L22्         m        // generated
        _L22L21) म (L21L22्      m        // generated
        L21) म (L21L22्          m        // generated
        _L20) म (L21L23_         m        // generated
        _L20) म (L21L23          m        // generated
        _L22L20) म (L21L23_      m        // generated
        _L22L20) म (L21L23       m        // generated
        L20) म (L21L23_          m        // generated
        L20) म (L21L23           m        // generated
        _L22) म (पL22_           m        // generated
        _L22) म (पL22            m        // generated
        _L21) म (L21L23_         m        // generated
        _L21) म (L21L23          m        // generated
        _L22L21) म (L21L23_      m        // generated
        _L22L21) म (L21L23       m        // generated
        L21) म (L21L23_          m        // generated
        L21) म (L21L23           m        // generated
        _L20) म (L21L22्         m        // generated
        _L22L20) म (L21L22्      m        // generated
        L20) म (L21L22्          m        // generated
        मँ         mV~        // + candrabindu
        म (_       m
        म (B       m
     ्) म (_       m@
    र्) म (_       m         // r +virama
    न्) म (_       m         // n +virama
